Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-12,144
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-12,144 to 81-12,151 shall be known and may be cited as the Site and Building Development Act.

Laws 2011, LB388, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB1165, § 23.
April 17, 2026